Florida, session 2026, SB998.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 96 97 Section 1.âSection 290.0401, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 98 Section 2.âSection 290.0411, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 99 Section 3.âSection 290.042, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 100 Section 4.âSection 290.043, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 101 Section 5.âSection 290.0455, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 102 Section 6.âSection 290.046, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 103 Section 7.âSection 290.047, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 104 Section 8.âSection 290.0475, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 105 Section 9.âSection 290.048, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 106 Section 10.âParagraph (d) of subsection (21) of section 107 253.025, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 108 253.025âAcquisition of state lands.â 109 (21) 110 (d)1.âA conveyance at less than appraised value must state 111 that the land will revert to the board of trustees if the land 112 is not used for its intended purposes as a military installation 113 buffer or if the military installation closes. 114 2.âAgencies of the Federal Government, including, but not 115 limited to, the United States Department of Defense and its 116 subordinate Departments of the Army, Navy, and Air Force, and 117 the Department of Homeland Securityâs United States Coast Guard, 118 are exempt from this paragraph, so long as the general and 119 overarching purpose of remaining as a military installation 120 buffer is still in place even though the specific military 121 purpose, mission, or function of the conveyed land is modified 122 or changes from that present or proposed purpose at the time of 123 the conveyance. 124 Section 11.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 125 288.0656, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 126 288.0656âRural Economic Development Initiative.â 127 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 128 (e)ââRural communityâ means: 129 1.âA county with a population of 75,000 or fewer. 130 2.âA county with a population of 125,000 or fewer which is 131 contiguous to a county with a population of 75,000 or fewer. 132 3.âA municipality within a county described in subparagraph 133 1. or subparagraph 2. 134 4.âAn unincorporated area recommended by the department and 135 designated by the Governor which has a population of 25,000 or 136 fewer and which meets federal enterprise community or an 137 incorporated rural city with a population of 25,000 or fewer and 138 an employment base focused on traditional agricultural or 139 resource-based industries, located in a county not defined as 140 rural, which has at least three or more of the economic distress 141 factors identified in paragraph (c) and verified by the 142 department. 143 144 For purposes of this paragraph, population shall be determined 145 in accordance with the most recent official estimate pursuant to 146 s. 186.901. 147 Section 12.âSection 290.044, Florida Statutes, is amended 148 to read: 149 (Substantial rewording of section. See 150 s. 290.044, F.S., for present text.) 151 290.044âFlorida Small Cities Community Development Block 152 Grant Program Fund; administration; distribution.â 153 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 154 (a)ââActâ means the Housing and Community Development Act 155 of 1974, as amended, and includes the implementing regulations 156 set forth at 24 C.F.R. part 570, as amended. 157 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Commerce. 158 (c)ââHUDâ means the United States Department of Housing and 159 Urban Development. 160 (d)ââProgramâ means the Florida Small Cities Community 161 Development Block Grant Program. 162 (2)âThe department is designated as the state agency to 163 receive federal funding from HUD and to administer the program 164 as set forth in the act. The department may award grants under 165 the program in any manner and in any amount, consistent with the 166 purposes and requirements of the act. The department may 167 disburse funds received from HUD consistent with the act. 168 (3)âIf, in any year, the department receives additional 169 federal funding through HUD for necessary expenses related to 170 disaster recovery, long-term recovery, or restoration of 171 infrastructure in impacted and distressed areas arising from the 172 consequences of a federally declared disaster, the department 173 must administer that funding in accordance with the law 174 authorizing such funding, including any implementing guidance or 175 regulations adopted by HUD. 176 (4)âIf, in any year, the department receives additional 177 federal funding through HUD for any other purpose not 178 specifically stated in this section, then the department must 179 administer that funding in accordance with the law authorizing 180 such funding, including any implementing guidance or regulations 181 adopted by HUD. 182 (5)âThe department may adopt rules to administer this 183 section. 184 Section 13.âPresent paragraphs (c), (d), (e), and (f) of 185 subsection (1) of section 448.095, Florida Statutes, are 186 redesignated as paragraphs (d), (f), (g), and (h), respectively, 187 new paragraphs (c) and (e) are added to that subsection, and 188 paragraph (b) of subsection (2), subsection (6), paragraphs (a) 189 and (c) of subsection (7) of that section are amended, and a new 190 paragraph (c) is added to subsection (3) of that section, and 191 subsection (4) of that section is reenacted, to read: 192 448.095âEmployment eligibility.â 193 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 194 (c)ââEmployerâ means any person, firm, company, 195 corporation, association, joint stock company, partnership, 196 organization, or other legal entity, or any agent thereof, that 197 engages one or more individuals to perform labor or services in 198 this state in exchange for salary, wages, or other remuneration. 199 The term does not include an occupant or owner of a private 200 residence with respect to an individual hired for casual labor 201 as defined in s. 443.036, which is performed entirely within 202 that private residence. The term does not include a person or 203 entity solely with respect to its engagement of an independent 204 contractor as defined in federal laws or regulations. 205 (e)ââNoncomplianceâ means the failure of an employer to 206 verify a new employeeâs employment eligibility through the E 207 Verify system, or an employerâs failure to timely provide copies 208 of any documentation requested by an entity or a person listed 209 in paragraph (3)(a). 210 (2)âEMPLOYMENT VERIFICATION.â 211 (b)1.âA public agency shall use the E-Verify system to 212 verify a new employeeâs employment eligibility as required under 213 paragraph (a). 214 2.âAn Beginning on July 1, 2023, A private employer with 25 215 or more employees shall use the E-Verify system to verify a new 216 employeeâs employment eligibility as required under paragraph 217 (a). Such employer shall maintain an E-Verify case result for 218 each employee which shows that the employee is authorized to 219 work. The E-Verify case result must visibly show the employeeâs 220 work authorization status. 221 3.âEach employer required to use the E-Verify system under 222 this paragraph must certify on its first return each calendar 223 year to the tax service provider that it is in compliance with 224 this section when making contributions to or reimbursing the 225 stateâs unemployment compensation or reemployment assistance 226 system. An employer that voluntarily uses the E-Verify system 227 may also make such a certification on its first return each 228 calendar year in order to document such use. 229 (3)âENFORCEMENT.â 230 (c)âFailure by an employer to provide the requested 231 documentation within 30 days after a written request made under 232 paragraph (a) constitutes noncompliance. Each failure to timely 233 provide the documentation will count as a noncompliance event 234 for the application of fines under paragraph (6)(b). 235 (4)âDEFENSES.â 236 (a)âAn employer that uses the E-Verify system or, if that 237 system is unavailable, the Employment Eligibility Verification 238 form (Form I-9) as provided in paragraph (2)(c), with respect to 239 the employment of an unauthorized alien has established a 240 rebuttable presumption that the employer has not violated s. 241 448.09 with respect to such employment. 242 (b)âAn employer that uses the same documentation that is 243 required by the United States Citizenship and Immigration 244 Services on its Employment Eligibility Verification form (Form 245 I-9) with respect to the employment of an unauthorized alien, 246 has established an affirmative defense that the employer has not 247 violated s. 448.09 with respect to such employment. 248 (6)âCOMPLIANCE.â 249 (a)âIn addition to the requirements under s. 288.061(6), 250 beginning on July 1, 2024, if the Department of Commerce has a 251 reasonable basis to believe determines that an employer failed 252 to use the E-Verify system to verify the employment eligibility 253 of employees as required under this section, the department 254 must, before the imposition of a fine or suspension of licenses, 255 issue an initial notification of noncompliance to the employer. 256 An employerâs failure to provide copies of any documentation 257 relied upon by the employer for the verification of a new 258 employeeâs employment eligibility to a person or entity listed 259 in paragraph (3)(a) constitutes a reasonable basis that the 260 employer failed to use the E-Verify system. The Department of 261 Commerce shall notify the employer that it has 30 days after the 262 date of the departmentâs initial notification to cure the 263 noncompliance. Extensions to the 30-day timeframe may be granted 264 by the department only upon a showing of good cause by the 265 employer for a period not to exceed 30 days. If the employer 266 does not timely cure its noncompliance, the department must 267 issue a final determination of noncompliance to the employer 268 pursuant to chapter 120. If the employer requests a hearing, the 269 hearing must be held pursuant to ss. 120.569 and 120.57(1), 270 except that the order of the administrative law judge is a final 271 order and is appealable pursuant to s. 120.68 notify the 272 employer of the departmentâs determination of noncompliance and 273 provide the employer with 30 days to cure the noncompliance. 274 (b)âIf the Department of Commerce determines that an 275 employer failed to use the E-Verify system as required under 276 this section and the employer failed to cure the noncompliance 277 according to paragraph (a) three times in any 24-month period, 278 the department must impose a fine of $1,000 for each employee 279 not verified pursuant to this section per day until the employer 280 provides sufficient proof to the department that the 281 noncompliance is cured. Any subsequent noncompliance by the 282 employer after the final determination of noncompliance 283 constitutes grounds for the suspension of all licenses issued by 284 a licensing agency subject to chapter 120 until the 285 noncompliance is cured. 286 (c)âTo cure noncompliance, the employer must do all of the 287 following: 288 1.âRegister with the E-Verify system, if not already 289 enrolled. 290 2.âProperly verify the employment eligibility of employees 291 by using the E-Verify system or Form I-9, as applicable under 292 this section. 293 3.âProvide an E-Verify case result and closure description 294 for each employee which shows that the employee is authorized to 295 work. 296 4.âProvide an affidavit to the department, under penalty of 297 perjury, that all instances of noncompliance have been corrected 298 and that the employer is in full compliance with this section. 299 (d)âFines collected under this subsection must be deposited 300 into the State Economic Enhancement and Development Trust Fund 301 for use by the department for employer outreach and public 302 notice of the stateâs employment verification laws. 303 (e)âThe Department of Commerce may adopt rules necessary to 304 implement this section. The department may establish procedures 305 for reporting, enforcement, compliance, noncompliance, license 306 suspension, and the application of fines, as well as any other 307 administrative rules required for effective enforcement and 308 administration. 309 (f)âIn addition to any penalties imposed under this 310 section, the Department of Commerce may recover the reasonable 311 costs of investigation and prosecution if an employer is found 312 to have violated this section. Such costs include, but are not 313 limited to, salaries and benefits of personnel, costs related to 314 the time spent by attorneys and other personnel on the 315 investigation and prosecution, and any other expenses incurred 316 by the department for such investigation and prosecution. The 317 department shall determine the amount of costs to be assessed 318 after its consideration of an affidavit of itemized costs and 319 any written objections thereto. If the assessed costs are not 320 paid within 60 days after the assessment, the department may 321 contract for the collection of such costs, in which case any 322 fees charged by the collection agent may be added to the amount 323 recovered from the employer, or may bring a civil action to 324 recover such costs, in which case the department is, if it is 325 the prevailing party, also entitled to recover its reasonable 326 attorney fees and costs incurred in such collection action. All 327 recovered costs, including additional amounts recovered for 328 collection efforts, must be deposited into the State Economic 329 Enhancement and Development Trust Fund. 330 (7)âCONSTRUCTION.â 331 (a)âThis section must be enforced without regard to race, 332 color, or national origin and must be construed in a manner so 333 as to be fully consistent with any applicable federal laws or 334 regulations. The Department of Commerce may not investigate 335 complaints that are based solely on race, color, or national 336 origin. 337 (c)âThis section expires shall expire 60 days after the E 338 Verify system is no longer provided or maintained by the Federal 339 Government, or when a pilot program, and the Federal Government 340 requires the use of the E-Verify system by all employers in the 341 United States. 342 Section 14.âSection 448.09, Florida Statutes, is amended to 343 read: 344 448.09âUnauthorized aliens; employment prohibited.â 345 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person to knowingly employ, 346 hire, recruit, or refer, either for herself or himself or on 347 behalf of another, for private or public employment within this 348 state, an alien who is not duly authorized to work by the 349 immigration laws of the United States, the Attorney General of 350 the United States, or the United States Secretary of the 351 Department of Homeland Security. For purposes of this section, 352 the term âknowingly employsâ means an employer is aware of an 353 unauthorized individual alienâs unauthorized status or fails to 354 take reasonable steps to verify their employment eligibility 355 after being made aware of potential violations. 356 (2)âIf the Department of Commerce finds or is notified by 357 an entity specified in s. 448.095(3)(a) that an employer has 358 knowingly employed an unauthorized alien, the department must 359 provide the employer with a written determination subject to 360 chapter 120. If the employer requests a hearing, the hearing 361 must be held pursuant to ss. 120.569 and 120.57(1), except that 362 the order of the administrative law judge is a final order and 363 is appealable pursuant to s. 120.68. If the administrative law 364 judge rules in favor of the department, or the employer loses 365 its appeal, the employer must repay without verifying the 366 employment eligibility of such person, the department must enter 367 an order pursuant to chapter 120 making such determination and 368 require repayment of any economic development incentive pursuant 369 to s. 288.061(6). For purposes of this section, the terms 370 âemployerâ and âunauthorized alienâ have the same meanings as in 371 s. 448.095(1). 372 (3)âFor a violation of this section, the department shall 373 place the employer on probation for a 1-year period and require 374 that the employer report quarterly to the department to 375 demonstrate compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) 376 and s. 448.095. On or before the last day of each quarter, the 377 employer shall submit an affidavit to the department that 378 affirms that the employer is not employing any unauthorized 379 aliens and is in compliance with s. 448.095. The first quarter 380 will commence from the issuance date of the final order. Each 381 subsequent quarter will commence 90 days after the previous 382 quarter. The Department of Commerce may enforce compliance with 383 this subsection by filing a petition for enforcement with the 384 circuit court in and for Leon County. Venue for all actions 385 pursuant to this subsection is in Leon County. 386 (4)âAny violation of this section which takes place within 387 24 months after a previous violation constitutes grounds for the 388 suspension or revocation of all licenses issued by a licensing 389 agency subject to chapter 120. The Department of Commerce must 390 provide the employer with a written determination subject to 391 chapter 120. The hearing must be held pursuant to ss. 120.569 392 and 120.57(1), except that the order of the administrative law 393 judge is a final order and is appealable pursuant to s. 120.68. 394 The department shall take the following actions for a violation 395 involving: 396 (a)âOne to ten unauthorized aliens, suspension of all 397 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 30 days 398 by the respective agencies that issued them. 399 (b)âEleven to fifty unauthorized aliens, suspension of all 400 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 60 days 401 by the respective agencies that issued them. 402 (c)âMore than fifty unauthorized aliens, revocation of all 403 applicable licenses held by a private employer by the respective 404 agencies that issued them. 405 (5)âAn alien who is not duly authorized to work by the 406 immigration laws of the United States, the Attorney General of 407 the United States, or the United States Secretary of the 408 Department of Homeland Security and who knowingly uses a false 409 identification document or who fraudulently uses an 410 identification document of another person for the purpose of 411 obtaining employment commits a felony of the third degree, 412 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 413 (6)âThe Department of Commerce may adopt rules to implement 414 this section. 415 Section 15.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 416 made by this act to section 288.0656, Florida Statutes, in a 417 reference thereto, paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 418 215.971, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 419 215.971âAgreements funded with federal or state 420 assistance.â 421 (1)âAn agency agreement that provides state financial 422 assistance to a recipient or subrecipient, as those terms are 423 defined in s. 215.97, or that provides federal financial 424 assistance to a subrecipient, as defined by applicable United 425 States Office of Management and Budget circulars, must include 426 all of the following: 427 (h)âIf the agency agreement provides federal or state 428 financial assistance to a county or municipality that is a rural 429 community or rural area of opportunity as those terms are 430 defined in s. 288.0656(2), a provision allowing the agency to 431 provide for the payment of invoices to the county, municipality, 432 or rural area of opportunity as that term is defined in s. 433 288.0656(2), for verified and eligible performance that has been 434 completed in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth 435 in the agreement. This provision is included to alleviate the 436 financial hardships that certain rural counties and 437 municipalities encounter when administering agreements, and must 438 be exercised by the agency when a county or municipality 439 demonstrates financial hardship, to the extent that federal or 440 state law, rule, or other regulation allows such payments. This 441 paragraph may not be construed to alter or limit any other 442 provisions of federal or state law, rule, or other regulation. 443 Section 16.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 444 made by this act to section 288.0656, Florida Statutes, in a 445 reference thereto, paragraph (j) of subsection (2) of section 446 288.062, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 447 288.062âRural Community Investment Program.â 448 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 449 (j)ââRural communityâ means a rural community as defined in 450 s. 288.0656 or a designated rural area of opportunity as defined 451 in s. 288.0656(2). 452 Section 17.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 453 made by this act to section 288.0656, Florida Statutes, in a 454 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 455 288.0655, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 456 288.0655âRural Infrastructure Fund.â 457 (2) 458 (b)âTo facilitate access of rural communities and rural 459 areas of opportunity as defined by the Rural Economic 460 Development Initiative to infrastructure funding programs of the 461 Federal Government, such as those offered by the United States 462 Department of Agriculture and the United States Department of 463 Commerce, and state programs, including those offered by Rural 464 Economic Development Initiative agencies, and to facilitate 465 local government or private infrastructure funding efforts, the 466 department may award grants for up to 75 percent of the total 467 infrastructure project cost, or up to 100 percent of the total 468 infrastructure project cost for a project located in a rural 469 community as defined in s. 288.0656(2) which is also located in 470 a fiscally constrained county as defined in s. 218.67(1) or a 471 rural area of opportunity as defined in s. 288.0656(2). Eligible 472 uses of funds may include improving any inadequate 473 infrastructure that has resulted in regulatory action that 474 prohibits economic or community growth and reducing the costs to 475 community users of proposed infrastructure improvements that 476 exceed such costs in comparable communities. Eligible uses of 477 funds include improvements to public infrastructure for 478 industrial or commercial sites and upgrades to or development of 479 public tourism infrastructure. Authorized infrastructure may 480 include the following public or public-private partnership 481 facilities: storm water systems; telecommunications facilities; 482 roads or other remedies to transportation impediments; nature 483 based tourism facilities; or other physical requirements 484 necessary to facilitate tourism, trade, and economic development 485 activities in the community. Authorized infrastructure may also 486 include publicly or privately owned self-powered nature-based 487 tourism facilities, publicly owned telecommunications 488 facilities, and additions to the distribution facilities of the 489 existing natural gas utility as defined in s. 366.04(3)(c), the 490 existing electric utility as defined in s. 366.02, or the 491 existing water or wastewater utility as defined in s. 492 367.021(12), or any other existing water or wastewater facility, 493 which owns a gas or electric distribution system or a water or 494 wastewater system in this state when: 495 1.âA contribution-in-aid of construction is required to 496 serve public or public-private partnership facilities under the 497 tariffs of any natural gas, electric, water, or wastewater 498 utility as defined herein; and 499 2.âSuch utilities as defined herein are willing and able to 500 provide such service. 501 Section 18.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 502 made by this act to section 288.0656, Florida Statutes, in a 503 reference thereto, subsection (10) of section 332.007, Florida 504 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 505 332.007âAdministration and financing of aviation and 506 airport programs and projects; state plan.â 507 (10)âSubject to the availability of appropriated funds, and 508 unless otherwise provided in the General Appropriations Act or 509 the substantive bill implementing the General Appropriations 510 Act, the department may fund up to 100 percent of eligible 511 project costs of all of the following at a public-use airport 512 located in a rural community as defined in s. 288.0656 which 513 does not have any scheduled commercial service: 514 (a)âThe capital cost of runway and taxiway projects that 515 add capacity. Such projects must be prioritized based on the 516 amount of available nonstate matching funds. 517 (b)âEconomic development transportation projects pursuant 518 to s. 339.2821. 519 520 Any remaining funds must be allocated for projects specified in 521 subsection (6). 522 Section 19.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 523 made by this act to section 288.0656, Florida Statutes, in a 524 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (14) of section 525 627.6699, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 526 627.6699âEmployee Health Care Access Act.â 527 (14)âSMALL EMPLOYERS ACCESS PROGRAM.â 528 (d)âEligibility.â 529 1.âAny small employer that is actively engaged in business, 530 has its principal place of business in this state, employs up to 531 25 eligible employees on business days during the preceding 532 calendar year, employs at least 2 employees on the first day of 533 the plan year, and has had no prior coverage for the last 6 534 months may participate. 535 2.âAny municipality, county, school district, or hospital 536 employer located in a rural community as defined in s. 537 288.0656(2) may participate. 538 3.âNursing home employers may participate. 539 4.âEach dependent of a person eligible for coverage is also 540 eligible to participate. 541 542 Any employer participating in the program must do so until the 543 end of the term for which the carrier providing the coverage is 544 obligated to provide such coverage to the program. Coverage for 545 a small employer group that ceases to meet the eligibility 546 requirements of this section may be terminated at the end of the 547 policy period for which the necessary premiums have been paid. 548 Section 20.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.